Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 3. Kennels

§ 3681.
Pet dealer permit.

A pet dealer shall apply to the municipal clerk of the town or city in which the cats, dogs, or wolf-hybrids are kept for a pet dealer permit to be issued on forms prescribed by the Secretary and pay the clerk a fee of $25.00 for the permit. A pet dealer who acquires a pet dealer permit shall allow inspections of the pet dealer’s premises pursuant to section 3682 of this title as a condition of receiving and retaining the permit. The provisions of subchapters 1, 2, and 4 of this chapter not inconsistent with this subchapter shall apply to the pet dealer permit, which shall be in addition to other permits required. A pet dealer permit shall expire on March 31 next after issuance and shall be displayed prominently on the premises in which the cats, dogs, or wolf-hybrids are kept. If the permit fee is not paid by April 1, the owner or keeper may thereafter procure a permit for that license year by paying a fee of 50 percent in excess of that otherwise required. Municipal clerks shall maintain a record of the type of animals being kept by the permit holder. Upon issuance of the pet dealer permit, the municipal clerk shall provide the pet dealer with a copy of Part 3 (Standards) of the Animal Welfare Rules adopted by the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets relating to cats, dogs, and wolf-hybrids. The municipal clerk shall also provide the pet dealer with contact information for the Animal Health Section within the Division of Food Safety and Consumer Protection of the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets and with information from the Department of Taxes on sales tax obligations for the sale of pets.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 27

, § 2, eff. March 24, 1971;

1971, No. 84

, § 12;

1977, No. 215

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. April 12, 1978;

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. April 1, 1995;

2013, No. 30

, § 4;

2021, No. 20

, § 206.

§ 3682.
Inspection of premises.

The pet dealer’s premises may be inspected upon the issuance of the pet dealer permit or at any time the pet dealer permit is in effect. Inspections may be conducted by a municipal animal control officer, a law enforcement officer as that term is defined in

23 V.S.A. § 4(11)

, or a representative of the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets. The inspector may, at his or her discretion and with the approval of the municipality, be accompanied by a veterinarian or an officer or agent of a humane society incorporated in Vermont. This section shall not create an obligation on the part of any municipal legislative body to conduct inspections.

Inspections shall be scheduled in advance with the pet dealer or pet dealer’s agent. Inspections shall be conducted to facilitate compliance with the applicable standards in Part 3 (Standards) of the Animal Welfare Rules adopted by the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets relating to cats, dogs, and wolf-hybrids. The person or persons authorized to inspect the pet dealer’s premises shall be accompanied by the pet dealer or pet dealer’s agent. If the pet dealer’s premises are also used for human habitation, the inspection may occur only in those areas of the premises used for animal housing, animal care, birthing, and storage of food and bedding. Photographs or videos of the pet dealer’s premises or property shall not be taken during an inspection and while on the pet dealer’s premises without the written consent of the permit holder. Repeated failure to consent to an inspection may result in a revocation of the pet dealer permit.

If an inspector, during the course of an inspection under this section, has reason to believe that a criminal animal welfare violation exists on the pet dealer’s premises, nothing in this chapter shall preclude a criminal investigation into the suspected violation or shall preclude seeking the remedies available under 13 V.S.A. chapter 8. Assessment of an administrative penalty under this chapter shall not prevent assessment of a criminal penalty under 13 V.S.A. chapter 8.

The inspector shall record the results of each inspection in a log and sign and date each entry. The entries shall be submitted to the municipality, which shall maintain records of all pet dealer inspections. A copy of the inspection results shall be provided to the permit holder.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 27

, § 3, eff. March 24, 1971;

1989, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 10(a), eff. Jan. 1, 1991;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2013, No. 30

, § 5;

2021, No. 20

, § 207.

§ 3683.
Quarantine of premises.

In the event such officer, representative, or agent and veterinarian shall find that domestic pets or wolf-hybrids are kept under unsanitary or inhumane conditions, that there is communicable disease among them, or that the condition of the domestic pets or wolf-hybrids is such as to jeopardize or endanger the health or safety of persons, they shall quarantine said premises by an order in writing delivered to the holder of the permit, which quarantine shall remain in effect until the conditions affording a basis for such quarantine order have been remedied.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 27

, § 4, eff. March 24, 1971;

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 21, eff. April 1, 1995.

§ 3684.
Offenses; bill of costs in prosecution.

The person operating a kennel who is found to have neglected to remedy conditions specified in a quarantine order issued pursuant to section 3683 of this subchapter, other than the prevalence of contagious disease, within ten days after receiving notice of the order, or who sells, gives away, or otherwise removes a domestic pet or wolf-hybrid under quarantine or affected with a contagious disease, shall be subject to the penalty provided in

13 V.S.A. § 353(a)(1)

. Necessary fees and expenses of a veterinarian designated by the officer or agent shall be included in the bill of costs in a prosecution made pursuant to this section and shall be taxed to the respondent.

HISTORY:

Amended

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. April 1, 1995;

2021, No. 20

, § 208.